Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB51.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Director" means the director of the Legislative Research Commission; and
(b) "Family impact statement" means a statement of the estimated effect on
Kentucky families in implementing or complying with any proposed bill or
resolution of the General Assembly whether filed in a regular session or
extraordinary session.
(2) A family impact statement shall:
(a) Be in writing;
(b) Be signed by the director or the director's designee; and
(c) Determine the extent to which the proposed bill or resolution of the General
Assembly will:
1. Raise or lower the cost of housing for a family;
2. Increase or decrease the likely marriage rate and the likelihood of
couples staying married;
3. Increase or decrease the out of wedlock birth rate;
4. Increase or decrease the cost of raising and educating a child;
5. Increase or decrease a parent's control over their children's
education;
6. Increase or decrease the likelihood of children completing education
to the point of being job ready;
7. Assist or hinder foster and adoption efforts; and
8. Assist or hinder the efforts to care for extended family members at
home or outside of the home.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/21/2025 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 990
(3) The director shall have the family impact statement prepared by the Legislative
Research Commission or by other departments or agencies of state government
for any bill or resolution introduced before the General Assembly. Departments
or agencies of state government so requested by the director shall comply with the
request within seven (7) working days of receipt. The family impact statement
shall be filed with the clerk in the chamber of the General Assembly in which the
bill or resolution was introduced and attached to each copy of the bill or
resolution.
(4) No bill or resolution shall be voted on by either chamber of the General Assembly
unless a family impact statement has been prepared pursuant to this section and
attached to the bill or resolution.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/21/2025 3:30 PM Jacketed